Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2601.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 28, chapter 20, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 28-6902, to read: START_STATUTE28-6902. Interstate 11 A. Not later than fourteen days after the effective date of this section, the department shall formally request from the federal highway administration for segmentation of the interstate 11 project between interstate 10 at the city of casa grande and the town of wickenburg as a segment of INDEPENDENT utility. B. Not later than three months after federal approval of segmentation requested pursuant to subsection A of this section, the department shall carry out the ENVIRONMENTAL reviews and OBTAIN any federal or state authorizations that are required for the segment described in subsection A of this section, consistent with applicable federal law and the federal highway administration's GUIDANCE. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative findings The legislature finds that: 1. A 2022 lawsuit stalled the entire Interstate 11 project statewide, even in areas not directly implicated by the lawsuit, delaying congestion relief, safety improvements and economic development. 2. Advancing the tier 2 study for the rest of the corridor is a lawful and practical solution. This advancement demonstrates independent utility, serves existing and projected transportation demand and can function regardless of future decisions on southern alignments. 3. The rest of the corridor is environmentally distinct from the contested portions of the corridor and does not raise the same land-use or protected-resource concerns at issue in the lawsuit. 4. Segmenting the project is consistent with federal highway administration precedent and long-standing national environmental policy act practice, allowing discrete projects to advance when the segments stand on separate merit. 5. Moving forward with tier 2 does not undermine the ongoing litigation. It simply ensures this state can continue responsible, incremental planning where legally permissible. 6. Interstate 11 is critical to Arizona's economic future, improving freight movement, supporting regional growth, enhancing interstate commerce and increasing safety for rapidly growing communities.